Wisconsin, session 2025, AB533.
do enact as follows:AB533,11Section 1. 115.28 (55s) of the statutes is created to read:AB533,2,42115.28 (55s) Voter education instruction; model standards and 3curriculum. (a) Incorporate voter education instruction into the model academic 4standards for social studies.AB533,2,65(b) Develop a model curriculum for pupils in grades kindergarten to 12 on 6voter education instruction.AB533,27Section 2. 118.40 (2r) (b) 2. m. of the statutes is created to read:AB533,2,98118.40 (2r) (b) 2. m. A requirement that the charter school’s curriculum 9include the instruction required under s. 121.02 (1) (L) 9.AB533,310Section 3. 118.40 (2x) (b) 2. m. of the statutes is created to read:AB533,2,1211118.40 (2x) (b) 2. m. A requirement that the charter school’s curriculum 12include the instruction required under s. 121.02 (1) (L) 9.AB533,413Section 4. 121.02 (1) (L) 9. of the statutes is created to read:AB533,2,1714121.02 (1) (L) 9. Beginning July 1, 2026, as part of the social studies 15curriculum, include at least one hour of voter education instruction in each 16elementary and high school grade. The instruction shall include all of the 17following:AB533,2,2018a. In the elementary grades, information on how the electoral process works, 19information on the importance of voting, mock elections, and information on who is 20eligible to vote.AB533,3,321b. In the middle school and high school grades, in addition to the information 22required under subd. 9. a. or 9. c., so far as applicable, information on the 23requirements and procedures for voting in-person and absentee, information on 1how pupils may locate reliable information about political candidates and issues, 2and the website addresses for official state government voting resources, including 3the elections commission’s website address.AB533,3,84c. In the high school grades, information on the importance of voting, 5information on how to register to vote, information on how to obtain and cast an 6absentee ballot, information on the use of paper ballots and voting systems, and 7information regarding how and where military electors and students attending 8postsecondary educational institutions may vote.AB533,59Section 5. Initial applicability.AB533,3,1210(1) Independent charter school contracts. The treatment of s. 118.40 11(2r) (b) 2. m. and (2x) (b) 2. m. first applies to a contract that is entered into, 12renewed, or modified on the effective date of this subsection.AB533,3,1313